Illinois, session 104th, SB1262.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Innovation and Technology Act 5is amended by adding Section 1-85 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1370/1-85 new)7    Sec. 1-85. Website translation system. On or before 8January 1, 2026, the Department shall develop and implement a 9system that allows users accessing a website operated by this 10State to automatically translate the contents of that website 11into another language. The system shall provide automatic 12translation to at least the 100 most commonly spoken language 13in this State. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.